src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/ve-za-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Tshivenda braille code (grade 2)

#-index-name: Tshivenda, contracted
#-display-name: Tshivenda contracted braille

#-copyright: 2021, South African Braille Authority
#-license: LGPLv2.1

# Copyright (C) 2021 South African Braille Authority <http://www.sabrailleauthority.org.za>
#
# This file is part of liblouis.
#
# liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
# under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
# published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of
# the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
# WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with liblouis. If not, see
# <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

#+language: ve
#+type: literary
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 2

#+system: ubc-ve
# "UBC" stands for "Unified Braille Code" and is a generalization of UEB.
# See https://sabrailleauthority.org.za/unified-braille-code-ubc.

# Tshivenda is one of the 11 official languages of South Africa. It is
# spoken primarily in the Limpopo province.
#
# The language uses the roman alphabet and has five diacritic letters.
#
# The code was substantially modified between 2010 and 2012. The code
# was also unified according to the principles of the UEB. It has 77
# contractions and no complex rules and no shortforms. We do not use
# additional codes such as Nemeth or computer braille codes; we use
# our unified Tshivenda code also for technical material.

# This table does bidirectional translation.
#+direction: both

# This table is Maintained by Christo de Klerk <cjdk@mweb.co.za>
#-author: Christo de Klerk <cjdk@mweb.co.za>
#-maintainer: Christo de Klerk <cjdk@mweb.co.za>

# Begin entries

# The following entry is necessary to distinguish between Nigerian naira and letter n with a dot above
sign \x20a6 56-4-1345 ₦ naira

include ve-za-g1.utb
include IPA-unicode-range.uti

multind 56-6 nocontractsign capsletter

seqdelimiter -—
seqdelimiter ‐   \x2010
seqdelimiter ‑   \x2011
seqdelimiter –   \x2013
seqdelimiter —   \x2014
seqbeforechars ([{"“'‘
seqafterchars  )]}"”'’.,;:.!?…

noback correct "’" "'"
noback correct "ŉ" "'n"

# Shape symbols require a grade 1 indicator (Section 3.22.1)
contraction \x25a0 ■ filled (solid) square
contraction \x25a1 □ square
contraction \x25a7 ▧ shaded square (upper left to lower right)
contraction \x25b2 ▲ filled (solid) (equilateral) triangle
contraction \x25b3 △ regular (equilateral) triangle
contraction \x25cb ○ circle
contraction \x25cd ◍ shaded circle

# Alphabet contractions
contraction B
contraction b
word bva 12
contraction C
contraction c
word zwe 14
contraction D
contraction d
word dza 145
contraction F
contraction f
word fa 124
contraction G
contraction g
word guma 1245
contraction H
contraction h
word ha 125
contraction L
contraction l
word lufuno 123
contraction M
contraction m
word muthu 134
contraction N
contraction n
word nnyi 1345
contraction P
contraction p
word pfa 1234
contraction Q
contraction q
word arali 12345
contraction R
contraction r
word ri 1235
contraction S
contraction s
word si 234
contraction T
contraction t
word tou 2345
contraction V
contraction v
word vha 1236
contraction W
contraction w
word wa 2456
contraction Y
contraction y
word yo 13456
contraction Z
contraction z
word zwa 1356

# Upper group contractions
partword nd 12346
partword ng 123456
always na 12356
always ka 2346
partword kh 23456
always ya 16
partword vh 126
always mu 146
partword th 1456
always la 156
always ni 1246
partword sh 12456
always lu 1256
always lo 246
always ma 34
always ku 346
always mi 345

# Lower group signs 
begmidword mb 23
begword dz 256
noback match %[^_]|%[^_~]%<*[([{] ye %[^_]|[)}\\]]%>*%[^_~] 26
partword ye 26
begmidword fh 235
partword zw 35

# Dot 5 contractions
always dzi 5-145
always funa 5-124
always ngani 5-1245
always hang 5-125
always inwi 5-24
always kona 5-13
always lini 5-123
always mini 5-134
always nṋe 5-1345
always oṱhe 5-135
always ralo 5-1235
always songo 5-234
always tsha 5-2345
always uthu 5-136
always vhudza 5-1236
always wanga 5-2456
always naho 5-12356
always khou 5-23456
always thoho 5-1456
always langa 5-156

# Dot 45 contractions
always fhedzi 45-124
always hone 45-125
always musi 45-134
always tshe 45-2345
always uri 45-136
always yone 45-13456
always nahone 45-12356

# Dots 456 contractions
always fanela 456-124
always hani 456-125
always ita 456-24
always mudzimu 456-134
always ṅwana 456-1345
always one 456-135
always phanda 456-1234
always isa 456-234
always tshi 456-2345
always iwa 456-2456
